Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1613
Certificate; issuance; filing.

When the commission issues a permit, it shall also issue a certificate stating that the permit has been issued, describing the area covered, and containing other information the commission deems appropriate. The commission shall file a copy of the certificate with the register of deeds in the county or counties where the storage facility is located.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 13.